Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB764.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 736(c) and 741 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 736. Conduct of referenda.* * *(c) Subsequent referenda.--The five-year moratorium on voting the same consolidation or merger question as provided in subsection (b) shall be deemed not to apply to:(1) any subsequent referendum question involving a consolidation or merger of any combination of two or more contiguous municipalities if the referendum question differs or is dissimilar in any way from a previous referendum question which was not approved as provided for in subsection 12345678910111213141516171819 (b)[.]; or(2) a new referendum ordered by a court under section 741(a.1) (relating to court review of transitional plan).§ 741. Court review of transitional plan.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (a.1) or (b), after the approval of a referendum pursuant to section 736 (relating to conduct of referenda), any person who is a resident of a municipality to be consolidated or merged may petition the court of common pleas to order the appropriate municipal governing bodies to:(1) implement the terms of a transitional plan and schedule adopted pursuant to section 734 (relating to joint agreement of governing bodies) or 737 (relating to consolidation or merger agreement); or(2) adopt or amend a transitional plan or schedule if the court finds that the failure to do so will result in the unreasonable perpetuation of the separate forms and classifications of government existing in the affected municipalities prior to the approval of the referendum.(a.1) Suspend implementation.--(1) In the case of the approval of a referendum initiated under section 735 (relating to initiative of electors seeking consolidation or merger without new home rule charter) or 735.1 (relating to initiative of electors seeking consolidation or merger with new home rule charter), the governing body of a municipality to be consolidated or merged may petition the court of common pleas any time prior to the effective date of the consolidation or merger by resolution to find that, because of alleged or apparent fraud, error or material loss impacting the finances of one 20250SB0764PN1322 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the municipalities to be consolidated or merged that occurred prior to the date of the initial referendum and was not disclosed in any official proceeding under this chapter or other law, implementation of the consolidation or merger should be suspended.(2) The court shall hold a hearing on the petition under paragraph (1) and order that a new referendum, replacing the previously held referendum, be held under section 736 if the court finds that the governing body's petition was supported by substantial evidence.(3) If a referendum is ordered under paragraph (2), the adoption or implementation of the consolidation or merger agreement that is the subject of the petition shall be suspended until a new referendum is approved.(b) Exception.--After consolidation or merger pursuant to section 735.1 [(relating to initiative of electors seeking consolidation or merger with new home rule charter)], any person who is a resident of the newly consolidated or merged municipality may petition the court of common pleas to order the governing body of that municipality to act to accept or provide alternatives to the recommendations of the commission in accordance with section 735.1(k)(3)(iii).Section 2. The addition of 53 Pa.C.S. § 741(a.1) shall apply to any referendum under 53 Pa.C.S. § 735 or 735.1 held on or after November 1, 2021 THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0764PN1322 - 3 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526